North Dakota, session 69, SB2352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subsection to section 54-23.3-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
To employ personnel and establish policies and procedures to authorize a child of a female
inmate to reside at the Heart River correctional center under the care and general control of
the female inmate if the child is eighteen months of age or younger. The policies must include
considerations of the residential safety of the child, the length of time the child may reside
within the facility, and treatment or other penological interest.

S. B. NO. 2352 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2352.
Senate Vote: Yeas 28 Nays 18 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 48 Nays 42 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State